Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-24,108
Purchases from distributees protected.

If property distributed in kind or a security interest therein is acquired by a purchaser or lender for value from a distributee who has received an instrument or deed of distribution from the personal representative, the purchaser or lender takes title free of any claims of the estate and incurs no personal liability to the estate, whether or not the distribution was proper. To be protected under this provision, a purchaser or lender need not inquire whether a personal representative acted properly in making the distribution in kind.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 186, UPC § 3-910.